Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.360

Referees or guardians not to be interested in purchase.

Neither of the referees, nor any person for the benefit of either of them, shall be interested in any purchase, nor shall the guardian of an infant be an interested party in the purchase of any real property being the subject of the suit, except for the benefit of the infant. All sales contrary to the provisions of this section shall be void.

[Code 1881 s 587; 1877 p 122 s 592; 1869 p 140 s 541; RRS s 873.]